Indiana, session 2026, HB1125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa services), as
set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
(22) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business opportunity
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive commercial
solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as set
forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue fraud),
as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts and
contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection actions of
a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as set
forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
(42) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by retail
pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(44) The act of:
(A) conveying or attempting to convey; or
(B) conspiring to convey or conspiring to attempt to
convey;
title to real property with the intent to deceive by recording
a false or fraudulent deed or affidavit.
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
SECTION 2. IC 24-5-0.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 133, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A person relying upon an
uncured or incurable deceptive act may bring an action for the damages
actually suffered as a consumer as a result of the deceptive act or five
hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater. The court may increase
damages for a willful deceptive act in an amount that does not exceed
the greater of:
(1) three (3) times the actual damages of the consumer suffering
the loss; or
(2) one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Except as provided in subsection (k), the court may award reasonable
attorney's fees to the party that prevails in an action under this
subsection. This subsection does not apply to a consumer transaction
in real property, including a claim or action involving a construction
defect (as defined in IC 32-27-3-1(5)) brought against a construction
professional (as defined in IC 32-27-3-1(4)), except for purchases of
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


time shares and camping club memberships. This subsection does not
apply with respect to a deceptive act described in section 3(b)(20) of
this chapter. This subsection also does not apply to a violation of
IC 24-4.7, IC 24-5-12, IC 24-5-14, or IC 24-5-14.5. Actual damages
awarded to a person under this section have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(b) Any person who is entitled to bring an action under subsection
(a) on the person's own behalf against a supplier for damages for a
deceptive act may bring a class action against such supplier on behalf
of any class of persons of which that person is a member and which has
been damaged by such deceptive act, subject to and under the Indiana
Rules of Trial Procedure governing class actions, except as herein
expressly provided. Except as provided in subsection (k), the court may
award reasonable attorney's fees to the party that prevails in a class
action under this subsection, provided that such fee shall be determined
by the amount of time reasonably expended by the attorney and not by
the amount of the judgment, although the contingency of the fee may
be considered. Except in the case of an extension of time granted by the
attorney general under IC 24-10-2-2(b) in an action subject to IC 24-10,
any money or other property recovered in a class action under this
subsection which cannot, with due diligence, be restored to consumers
within one (1) year after the judgment becomes final shall be returned
to the party depositing the same. This subsection does not apply to a
consumer transaction in real property, except for purchases of time
shares and camping club memberships. This subsection does not apply
with respect to a deceptive act described in section 3(b)(20) of this
chapter. Actual damages awarded to a class have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(c) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction, including a deceptive act described in section
3(b)(20) of this chapter, notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b).
However, the attorney general may seek to enjoin patterns of incurable
deceptive acts with respect to consumer transactions in real property.
In addition, the court may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the supplier to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the aggrieved consumers to be held in escrow for
distribution to aggrieved consumers;
(3) for a knowing violation against a senior consumer, increase
the amount of restitution ordered under subdivision (2) in any
amount up to three (3) times the amount of damages incurred or
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


value of property or assets lost;
(4) order the supplier to pay to the state the reasonable costs of
the attorney general's investigation and prosecution, expert fees,
and court fees related to the action;
(5) provide for the appointment of a receiver; and
(6) order the department of state revenue to suspend the supplier's
registered retail merchant certificate, subject to the requirements
and prohibitions contained in IC 6-2.5-8-7(a)(5), if the court finds
that a violation of this chapter involved the sale or solicited sale
of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a synthetic
drug lookalike substance (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321.5
(repealed)) (before July 1, 2019), a controlled substance analog
(as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or a substance represented to be a
controlled substance (as described in IC 35-48-4-4.6).
(d) In an action under subsection (a), (b), (c), or (n) the court may
void or limit the application of contracts or clauses resulting from
deceptive acts and order restitution to be paid to aggrieved consumers.
(e) In any action under subsection (a) or (b), upon the filing of the
complaint or on the appearance of any defendant, claimant, or any
other party, or at any later time, the trial court, the supreme court, or the
court of appeals may require the plaintiff, defendant, claimant, or any
other party or parties to give security, or additional security, in such
sum as the court shall direct to pay all costs, expenses, and
disbursements that shall be awarded against that party or which that
party may be directed to pay by any interlocutory order by the final
judgment or on appeal.
(f) Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued under
subsection (c) or (n) shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of
not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per violation. For the
purposes of this section, the court issuing an injunction shall retain
jurisdiction, the cause shall be continued, and the attorney general
acting in the name of the state may petition for recovery of civil
penalties. Whenever the court determines that an injunction issued
under subsection (c) or (n) has been violated, the court shall award
reasonable costs to the state.
(g) If a court finds any person has knowingly violated section 3 or
10 of this chapter, other than section 3(b)(19), 3(b)(20), or 3(b)(40) of
this chapter, the attorney general, in an action pursuant to subsection
(c), may recover from the person on behalf of the state a civil penalty
of a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.
(h) If a court finds that a person has violated section 3(b)(19) of this
chapter, the attorney general, in an action under subsection (c), may
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


recover from the person on behalf of the state a civil penalty as follows:
(1) For a knowing or intentional violation, one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500).
(2) For a violation other than a knowing or intentional violation,
five hundred dollars ($500).
A civil penalty recovered under this subsection shall be deposited in
the consumer protection division telephone solicitation fund
established by IC 24-4.7-3-6 to be used for the administration and
enforcement of section 3(b)(19) of this chapter.
(i) A senior consumer relying upon an uncured or incurable
deceptive act, including an act related to hypnotism, may bring an
action to recover treble damages, if appropriate.
(j) An offer to cure is:
(1) not admissible as evidence in a proceeding initiated under this
section unless the offer to cure is delivered by a supplier to the
consumer or a representative of the consumer before the supplier
files the supplier's initial response to a complaint; and
(2) only admissible as evidence in a proceeding initiated under
this section to prove that a supplier is not liable for attorney's fees
under subsection (k).
If the offer to cure is timely delivered by the supplier, the supplier may
submit the offer to cure as evidence to prove in the proceeding in
accordance with the Indiana Rules of Trial Procedure that the supplier
made an offer to cure.
(k) A supplier may not be held liable for the attorney's fees and
court costs of the consumer that are incurred following the timely
delivery of an offer to cure as described in subsection (j) unless the
actual damages awarded, not including attorney's fees and costs, exceed
the value of the offer to cure.
(l) If a court finds that a person has knowingly violated section
3(b)(20) of this chapter, the attorney general, in an action under
subsection (c), may recover from the person on behalf of the state a
civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
consumer. In determining the amount of the civil penalty in any action
by the attorney general under this subsection, the court shall consider,
among other relevant factors, the frequency and persistence of
noncompliance by the debt collector, the nature of the noncompliance,
and the extent to which the noncompliance was intentional. A person
may not be held liable in any action by the attorney general for a
violation of section 3(b)(20) of this chapter if the person shows by a
preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and
resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. A person may not be
held liable in any action for a violation of this chapter for contacting a
person other than the debtor, if the contact is made in compliance with
the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act.
(m) If a court finds that a person has knowingly or intentionally
violated section 3(b)(40) of this chapter, the attorney general, in an
action under subsection (c), may recover from the person on behalf of
the state a civil penalty in accordance with IC 24-5-14.5-12(b). As
specified in IC 24-5-14.5-12(b), a civil penalty recovered under
IC 24-5-14.5-12(b) shall be deposited in the consumer protection
division telephone solicitation fund established by IC 24-4.7-3-6 to be
used for the administration and enforcement of IC 24-5-14.5. In
addition to the recovery of a civil penalty in accordance with
IC 24-5-14.5-12(b), the attorney general may also recover reasonable
attorney fees and court costs from the person on behalf of the state.
Those funds shall also be deposited in the consumer protection division
telephone solicitation fund established by IC 24-4.7-3-6.
(n) An action that arises from, or otherwise involves, an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction described in section 2(a)(1)(D)(i) of this chapter
may be brought and enforced only by the attorney general under this
subsection. An action that arises from, or otherwise involves, an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction described in section 2(a)(1)(D)(ii) of this chapter
may be brought and enforced only by an attorney acting on behalf of
the local law enforcement agency involved in the transaction, unless
the local unit of government served by the local law enforcement
agency requests the attorney general to bring and enforce an action
under this subsection on behalf of the local unit. In addition, the court
may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the supplier to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the aggrieved consumers to be held in escrow for
distribution to aggrieved consumers; or
(3) order the supplier to pay to:
(A) the attorney acting on behalf of the local law enforcement
agency; or
(B) the attorney general for the state;
as applicable, the reasonable costs of the attorney's or the attorney
general's investigation and prosecution, expert fees, and court fees
related to the action.
The time for bringing an action under subsection (c), as set forth in
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151


section 5(b) of this chapter, applies to an action brought under this
subsection.
(o) If a court finds that a person has knowingly or intentionally
violated section 3(b)(44) of this chapter, the court may issue an
injunction, quiet title to the real property, and award a monetary
judgment in favor of the person who relied on the false or
fraudulent deed or affidavit. An award for monetary judgment
under this subsection may include:
(1) compensatory damages in an amount not more than three
(3) times the actual damages of the person suffering the loss;
(2) punitive damages in an amount not less than two (2) times
the maximum amount of compensatory damages under
subdivision (1); and
(3) attorney's fees and costs.
2026 IN 1125—LS 6555/DI 151